California statutes. Insurance Code
(a) An insurer shall not deny or refuse to accept an application for life insurance, or refuse to insure, refuse to renew, cancel, restrict, or otherwise terminate a policy of life insurance, or charge a different rate for the same life insurance coverage, based solely upon the applicant’s or insured’s past or future lawful travel destinations.

(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from excluding or limiting coverage under a life insurance policy, or refusing to offer life insurance, based upon lawful travel, or from charging a different rate for that coverage, when that action is based upon sound actuarial principles or is related to actual and reasonably expected experience.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 446, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.

Subject to Section 2459 of the Probate Code, in respect to life or disability insurance, or annuity contracts (except as provided in Sections 2500 to 2507, inclusive, of the Probate Code and Section 3500 of the Probate Code and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3600) of Part 8 of Division 4 of the Probate Code), heretofore or hereafter issued to or upon the life of any person not of a full 18 years of age for the benefit of such minor or for the benefit of the father, mother, spouse, child, brother, or sister, of such minor, or issued to such minor, subject to written consent of a parent or guardian, upon the life of any person in whom such minor has an insurable interest for the benefit of himself or herself or such minor’s father, mother, spouse, child, brother or
 sister, such minor shall not, by reason only of such minority, be deemed incompetent to contract for such insurance or annuity, or for the surrender thereof, or to exercise all contractual rights thereunder, or, subject to approval of a parent or guardian, to give a valid discharge for any benefit accruing or for any money payable thereunder; provided, that all such contracts made by a minor under 16 years of age, as determined by the nearest birthday, shall have the written consent of a parent or guardian, and that the exercise of all contractual rights under such contracts, or the surrender thereof, or the giving of a valid discharge for any benefit accruing or money payable thereunder, in the case of a minor under 16 years of age, as determined by the nearest birthday, shall have the written consent of a parent or guardian.

All such contracts made by a minor not of a full 18 years of age which may result in any personal liability for assessment shall have the
 written assumption of any such liability by a parent or guardian in consideration of the issuance of the contract. Such assumption shall be in a form approved by the commissioner, reasonably designed to inform the parent or guardian of the liability thus assumed.

Such assumption of liability may be made a part of and included with any written consent of such parent or guardian required under other provisions of this section and it may be provided therein that such assumption shall cover only up to the anniversary date of the policy nearest to the member’s birthday at which he or she attains 18 years of age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 57.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.1.

(a) An individual or group health insurance policy shall not establish either of the following:

(1) Lifetime limits on the dollar value of any covered benefits for an insured, whether provided in network or out of network.

(2) Annual limits on the dollar value of any covered benefits for an insured, whether provided in network or out of network.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not prevent a group health insurance policy from placing annual or lifetime per-insured limits on specific covered benefits that are not essential health benefits, as defined under Section 10112.27, to the extent that those limits are otherwise
 permitted under state law.

(c) This section does not apply to a specialized health insurance policy that does not cover an essential health benefit, as defined under Section 10112.27, or a Medicare supplement policy.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 302, Sec. 15.   (SB 406)   Effective September 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.2.

(a) A group or individual nongrandfathered health insurance policy shall, at a minimum, provide coverage for and shall not impose any cost-sharing requirements for any of the following:

(1) Evidence-based items or services that had in effect on January 1, 2025, a rating of “A” or “B” in the recommendations of the United States Preventive Services Task Force or
 any modification or supplement to that recommendation adopted pursuant to Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Immunizations that had in effect on January 1, 2025, a recommendation from the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or any modification or supplement to that recommendation adopted pursuant to Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code with respect to the individual involved.

(3) With respect to infants, children,
 and adolescents, evidence-informed preventive care and screenings provided in the comprehensive guidelines, as periodically updated, supported by the United States Health Resources and Services Administration as of January 1, 2025, or any modification or supplement to that recommendation adopted pursuant to Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) With respect to women, those additional preventive care and screenings not described in paragraph (1) as provided for in comprehensive guidelines supported by the United States Health Resources and Services Administration
 as of January 1, 2025, or any modification or supplement to that recommendation adopted pursuant to Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) For the purposes of this section:

(A) The recommendations of the United States Preventive Services Task Force as of January 1, 2025, or any modification or supplement to that recommendation adopted pursuant to Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code regarding breast cancer screening, mammography, and prevention shall be considered the most current other than those issued in or around November 2009.

(B) A health insurance
 policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2025, shall not impose any cost-sharing requirements for any items or services that are integral to the provision of an item or service that is required by this section, regardless of whether or not the integral item or service is billed separately from an item or service that is required by this section.

(6) For the purposes of this section, a health insurance policy shall not impose cost sharing for office visits associated with the preventive care services described in this section if the preventive care service is not billed separately, or is not tracked as an individual encounter separately, from the office visit and the primary purpose of the office visit is the delivery of the preventive
 care service.

(b) This section does not prohibit a health insurance policy from providing coverage for preventive items or services in addition to those required by subdivision (a).

(c) A health insurer shall provide coverage pursuant to subdivision (a) for policy years that begin on or after the date that is one year after the date the recommendation or guideline is issued.

(1) A health insurer that is required to provide coverage for any items and services specified in a recommendation or guideline described in subdivision (a) on the first day of a policy year shall provide coverage through the last day of the policy year, even if the recommendation or guideline changes or is no longer described in subdivision (a) during the policy year.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph
 (1) and consistent with the authority granted to the State Department of Public Health pursuant to Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code,
 if any item or service associated with any recommendation or guideline specified in subdivision (a) is subject to a safety recall or is otherwise determined to pose a significant safety concern by a federal agency authorized to regulate the item or service during a policy year, a health insurer is not required to cover the item or service through the last day of the policy year.

(d) A health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2025, shall cover items and services pursuant to this section in accordance with any applicable requirement of this part, including, but not limited to, Section 10123.18 on cervical cancer screening, Section 10123.1933 on prophylaxis of HIV infection, Section 10123.207 on colorectal cancer screening, and Section 10123.208 on home test kits for sexually transmitted diseases.

(e) This section does not apply to
 a specialized health insurance policy that does not cover an essential health benefit, as defined in Section 10112.27. This section shall only apply to a health savings account-eligible health insurance policy to the extent it does not fail to be treated as a high deductible health insurance policy under Section 223 of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(f) The department shall coordinate with the Department of Managed Health Care if it adopts regulations to implement this section.

(g) The commissioner may exercise the authority provided by this code and the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to implement and enforce this section and all sections related to preventive services, including those
 referenced herein. If the commissioner assesses a civil penalty for a violation, any hearing that is requested by the insurer may be conducted by an administrative law judge of the Administrative Hearing Bureau of the department under the formal procedure of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. A civil penalty shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation, or, if a violation was willful, shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation. This subdivision does not impair or restrict the commissioner’s authority pursuant to another provision of this code or the Administrative Procedure Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 45.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.25.

(a) A health insurer that issues, sells, renews, or offers health insurance policies for health care coverage in this state, including a grandfathered health plan, but not including specialized health insurance policies that provide only dental or vision services, shall provide an annual rebate to each insured under that coverage, on a pro rata basis, if the ratio of the amount of premium revenue expended by the health insurer on the costs for reimbursement for clinical services provided to insureds under that coverage and for activities that improve health care quality to
 the total amount of premium revenue, excluding federal and state taxes and licensing or regulatory fees and after accounting for payments or receipts for risk adjustment, risk corridors, and reinsurance, is less than the following:

(1) With respect to a health insurer offering coverage in the large group market, 85 percent.

(2) With respect to a health insurer offering coverage in the small group market or in the individual market, 80 percent.

(b) A health insurer that issues, sells, renews, or offers health insurance policies for health care coverage in this state, including a grandfathered health plan, shall comply with the following minimum medical loss ratios:

(1) With respect to a health insurer offering coverage in the large group market, 85 percent.

(2) With respect to a health insurer offering coverage in the small group market or in the individual market, 80 percent.

(c) (1) The total amount of an annual rebate required under this section shall be calculated in an amount equal to the product of the following:

(A) The amount by which the percentage described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) exceeds the ratio described in paragraph
 (1) or (2) of subdivision (a).

(B) The total amount of premium revenue, excluding federal and state taxes and licensing or regulatory fees and after accounting for payments or receipts for risk adjustment, risk corridors, and reinsurance.

(2) A health insurer shall provide a rebate owing to an insured no later than September 30 of the calendar year following the year for which the ratio described in subdivision (a) was calculated.

(d) The commissioner may adopt regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act
 (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) that are necessary to implement the medical loss ratio as described under Section 2718 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-18), and any federal rules or regulations issued under that section.

(e) The requirements of this section shall be implemented as described in Section 2791 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-91) and the requirements of Section 2718 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-18) and any rules or regulations issued under those sections as in effect on January 1, 2017.

(f) This section does not apply to a health care service plan contract or insurance policy issued, sold, renewed, or
 offered for health care services or coverage provided in the Medi-Cal program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 678, Sec. 2.   (AB 2499)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.26.

(a) A health insurer that issues, sells, renews, or offers a policy covering dental services shall file a report with the department, by July 31 of each year, which shall be known as the MLR annual report. The MLR annual report shall be organized by market and product type and contains the same information required in the 2013 federal Medical Loss Ratio (MLR) Annual Reporting Form (CMS-10418). The department shall post a health insurer’s MLR annual report on its Internet
 Web site within 45 days after receiving the report.

(b) The MLR reporting year shall be for the calendar year during which dental coverage is provided by the plan. As applicable, all terms used in the MLR annual report shall have the same meaning as used in the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-18) and Part 158 (commencing with Section 158.101) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) If the commissioner decides to conduct an examination, as described in Section 730, because the commissioner finds it necessary to verify the health insurer’s representations in the MLR annual
 report, the department shall provide the health insurer with a notification 30 days before the commencement of the examination.

(d) The health insurer shall have 30 days from the date of notification to electronically submit to the department all requested records, books, and papers specified in subdivision (a) of Section 733. The commissioner may extend the time for a health insurer to comply with this subdivision upon a finding of good cause.

(e) The department shall make available to the public all of the data provided to the department pursuant to this section.

(f) This section does not apply to an insurance policy issued, sold, renewed, or offered for health care services or coverage provided in the Medi-Cal
 program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200)
 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), the Medi-Cal Access Program (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15810) of Part 3.3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), or the California Major Risk Medical Insurance Program (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15870) of Part 3.3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), to the extent consistent with the
 federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148).

(g) This section does not apply to disability insurance for covered benefits in the single specialized area of dental-only health care that pays benefits on a fixed benefit, cash payment only basis.

(h) The department may issue guidance to health insurers of specialized health insurance policies subject to this section regarding compliance with this section. The guidance shall not be subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and shall be effective only until the department adopts regulations pursuant to that act. The department shall consult with the Department
 of Managed Health Care in issuing the guidance specified in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 933, Sec. 4.   (SB 1008)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.27.

(a) An individual or small group health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2017, shall include, at a minimum, coverage for essential health benefits pursuant to the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (PPACA) and as outlined in this section. This section shall exclusively govern the benefits a health insurer must cover as essential health benefits. For purposes of this section, “essential health benefits” means all of the following:

(1) Health benefits within the categories identified in Section 1302(b) of PPACA: ambulatory patient services, emergency services, hospitalization, maternity and newborn care, mental health and
 substance use disorder services, including behavioral health treatment, prescription drugs, rehabilitative and habilitative services and devices, laboratory services, preventive and wellness services and chronic disease management, and pediatric services, including oral and vision care.

(2) (A) The health benefits covered by the Kaiser Foundation Health Plan Small Group HMO 30 plan (federal health product identification number 40513CA035) as this plan was offered during the first quarter of 2014, as follows, regardless of whether the benefits are specifically referenced in the plan contract or evidence of coverage for that plan:

(i) Medically necessary basic health care services, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code and
 Section 1300.67 of Title 28 of the California Code of Regulations.

(ii) The health benefits mandated to be covered by the plan pursuant to statutes enacted before December 31, 2011, as described in the following sections of the Health and Safety Code: Sections 1367.002, 1367.06, and 1367.35 (preventive services for children); Section 1367.25 (prescription drug coverage for contraceptives); Section 1367.45 (AIDS vaccine); Section 1367.46 (HIV testing); Section 1367.51 (diabetes); Section 1367.54 (alpha-fetoprotein testing); Section 1367.6 (breast cancer screening); Section 1367.61 (prosthetics for laryngectomy); Section 1367.62 (maternity hospital stay); Section 1367.63 (reconstructive surgery); Section 1367.635 (mastectomies); Section 1367.64 (prostate cancer); Section 1367.65 (mammography); Section 1367.66 (cervical cancer); Section
 1367.665 (cancer screening tests); Section 1367.67 (osteoporosis); Section 1367.68 (surgical procedures for jaw bones); Section 1367.71 (anesthesia for dental); Section 1367.9 (conditions attributable to diethylstilbestrol); Section 1368.2 (hospice care); Section 1370.6 (cancer clinical trials); Section 1371.5 (emergency response ambulance or ambulance transport services); subdivision (b) of Section 1373 (sterilization operations or procedures); Section 1373.4 (inpatient hospital and ambulatory maternity); Section 1374.56 (phenylketonuria); Section 1374.17 (organ transplants for HIV); Section 1374.72 (mental health parity); and Section 1374.73 (autism/behavioral health treatment).

(iii) Any other benefits mandated to be covered by the plan pursuant to statutes enacted before December 31, 2011, as described in those statutes.

(iv) The health benefits covered by the plan that are not otherwise required to be covered under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, to the extent otherwise required pursuant to Sections 1367.18, 1367.21, 1367.215, 1367.22, 1367.24, and 1367.25 of the Health and Safety Code, and Section 1300.67.24 of Title 28 of the California Code of Regulations.

(v) Any other health benefits covered by the plan that are not otherwise required to be covered under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) If there are any conflicts or omissions in the plan identified in subparagraph (A) as compared with the requirements for health benefits
 under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code that were enacted before December 31, 2011, the requirements of Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code shall control, except as otherwise specified in this section.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) or any other provision of this section, the home health services benefits covered under the plan identified in subparagraph (A) shall not be in conflict with Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(D) For purposes of this section, the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-343) shall apply to a policy subject to this section. Coverage
 of mental health and substance use disorder services pursuant to this paragraph, along with any scope and duration limits imposed on the benefits, shall be in compliance with the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-343), and all rules, regulations, and guidance issued pursuant to Section 2726 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-26).

(E) Commencing January 1, 2027, if the United States Department of Health and Human Services approves a new essential health benefits benchmark plan for the State of California pursuant to submissions to the department made on behalf of the state in 2025 for this purpose, the benchmark plan described in subparagraph (A) shall additionally include all of the following benefits:

(i) Services to evaluate, diagnose, and treat infertility that include all of the following:

(I) Artificial insemination.

(II) Three attempts to retrieve gametes.

(III) Three attempts to create embryos.

(IV) Three rounds of pretransfer testing.

(V) Cryopreservation of gametes and embryos.

(VI) Two years of storage for cryopreserved embryos.

(VII) Unlimited storage for cryopreserved gametes.

(VIII) Unlimited embryo transfers.

(IX) Two vials of donor sperm.

(X) Ten donor eggs.

(XI) Surrogacy coverage for the services described above.

(XII) Health testing of the surrogate for each attempted round of covered services.

(ii) All of the following durable medical equipment:

(I) Mobility devices, including, but not limited to, walkers and manual and power wheelchairs and scooters.

(II) Augmented communications devices, including, but not limited to, speech-generating
 devices, communications boards, and computer applications.

(III) Continuous positive airway pressure machines.

(IV) Portable oxygen.

(V) Hospital beds.

(iii) (I) An annual hearing exam.

(II) One hearing aid per ear every three years.

(3) With respect to habilitative services, in addition to any habilitative services and devices identified in paragraph (2), coverage shall also be provided as required by federal rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to Section 1302(b) of PPACA. Habilitative services and
 devices shall be covered under the same terms and conditions applied to rehabilitative services and devices under the policy. Limits on habilitative and rehabilitative services and devices shall not be combined.

(4) With respect to pediatric vision care, the same health benefits for pediatric vision care covered under the Federal Employees Dental and Vision Insurance Program vision plan with the largest national enrollment as of the first quarter of 2014. The pediatric vision care services covered pursuant to this paragraph shall be in addition to, and shall not replace, any vision services covered under the plan identified in paragraph (2).

(5) With respect to pediatric oral care, the same health benefits for pediatric oral care covered under the dental benefit received by
 children under the Medi-Cal program as of 2014, including the provision of medically necessary orthodontic care provided pursuant to the federal Children’s Health Insurance Program Reauthorization Act of 2009. The pediatric oral care benefits covered pursuant to this paragraph shall be in addition to, and shall not replace, any dental or orthodontic services covered under the plan identified in paragraph (2).

(b) Treatment limitations imposed on health benefits described in this section shall be no greater than the treatment limitations imposed by the corresponding plans identified in subdivision (a), subject to the requirements set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), this section does not permit a health insurer to make
 substitutions for the benefits required to be covered under this section, regardless of whether those substitutions are actuarially equivalent.

(d) To the extent permitted under Section 1302 of PPACA and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to that section, and to the extent that substitution would not create an obligation for the state to defray costs for any individual, an insurer may substitute its prescription drug formulary for the formulary provided under the plan identified in subdivision (a) if the coverage for prescription drugs complies with the sections referenced in clauses (ii) and (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) that apply to prescription drugs.

(e) A health insurer, or its agent, producer, or representative, shall not
 issue, deliver, renew, offer, market, represent, or sell any product, policy, or discount arrangement as compliant with the essential health benefits requirement in federal law, unless it meets all of the requirements of this section. This subdivision shall be enforced in the same manner as Section 790.03, including through the means specified in Sections 790.035 and 790.05.

(f) This section applies regardless of whether the policy is offered inside or outside the California Health Benefit Exchange created by Section 100500 of the Government Code.

(g) This section does not exempt a health insurer or a health insurance policy from meeting other applicable requirements of law.

(h) This section does not prohibit a policy
 from covering additional benefits, including, but not limited to, spiritual care services that are tax deductible under Section 213 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(i) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A policy that provides excepted benefits as described in Sections 2722 and 2791 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-21; 42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-91).

(2) A policy that qualifies as a grandfathered health plan under Section 1251 of PPACA or any binding rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to that section.

(j) This section shall not be implemented in a manner that conflicts with a requirement of PPACA.

(k) An essential health benefit is required to be provided under this section only to the extent that federal law does not require the state to defray the costs of the benefit.

(l) This section does not obligate the state to incur costs for the coverage of benefits that are not essential health benefits as defined in this section.

(m) An insurer is not required to cover, under this section, changes to health benefits that are the result of statutes enacted on or after December 31, 2011.

(n) (1) On or before January 1, 2027, the commissioner may issue guidance to health insurers regarding compliance with this section. This guidance shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(2) The commissioner may promulgate regulations subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to implement this section. This subdivision shall not be construed to impair or restrict the commissioner’s rulemaking authority pursuant to another provision of this code or the Administrative Procedure Act.

(3) The commissioner shall consult with the Department of Managed Health Care in issuing guidance and in adopting regulations pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) for the purpose of implementing this section.

(o) This section does not impose on health insurance policies the cost sharing or network limitations of the plans identified in subdivision (a) except to the extent otherwise required to comply with this code, including this section, and as otherwise applicable to all health insurance policies offered to individuals and small groups.

(p) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Habilitative services” means health care services and devices
 that help a person keep, learn, or improve skills and functioning for daily living. Examples include therapy for a child who is not walking or talking at the expected age. These services may include physical and occupational therapy, speech-language pathology, and other services for people with disabilities in a
 variety of inpatient or outpatient settings, or both. Habilitative services shall be covered under the same terms and conditions applied to rehabilitative services under the policy.

(2) (A) “Health benefits,” unless otherwise required to be defined pursuant to federal rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to Section 1302(b) of PPACA, means health care items or services for the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of illness, injury, disease, or a health condition, including a behavioral health condition.

(B) “Health benefits” does not mean any cost-sharing requirements such as copayments, coinsurance, or deductibles.

(3) “PPACA” means the federal Patient
 Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued thereunder.

(4) “Small group health insurance policy” means a group health insurance policy issued to a small employer, as defined in subdivision (q) of Section 10753.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 680, Sec. 2.   (AB 224)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.28.

(a) This section shall apply to nongrandfathered individual and group health insurance policies that provide coverage for essential health benefits, as defined in Section 10112.27, and that are issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2015.

(b) (1) For nongrandfathered health insurance policies in the individual or small group markets, a health insurance policy, except a specialized health insurance policy, that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2015, shall provide for a limit on annual out-of-pocket expenses for all covered benefits that meet the definition of essential health benefits in Section 10112.27, including out-of-network emergency care.

(2) For nongrandfathered health insurance policies in the large group market, a health insurance policy, except a specialized health insurance policy, that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2015, shall provide for a limit on annual out-of-pocket expenses for covered benefits, including out-of-network emergency care. This limit shall apply only to essential health benefits, as defined in Section 10112.27, that are covered under the policy to the extent that this provision does not conflict with federal law or guidance on out-of-pocket maximums for nongrandfathered health insurance policies in the large group market.

(c) (1) The limit described in subdivision (b) shall not exceed the limit described in Section 1302(c) of PPACA and any subsequent rules, regulations, or guidance issued under that section.

(2) The limit described in subdivision (b) shall result in a total maximum out-of-pocket limit for all covered essential health benefits that shall equal the dollar amounts in effect under Section 223(c)(2)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 with the dollar amounts adjusted as specified in Section 1302(c)(1)(B) of PPACA.

(3) For family coverage, an individual within a family shall not have a maximum out-of-pocket limit that is greater than the maximum out-of-pocket limit for individual coverage for that product.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the reduction in cost sharing for eligible insureds described in Section 1402 of PPACA and any subsequent rules, regulations, or guidance issued under that section.

(e) If an
 essential health benefit is offered or provided by a specialized health insurance policy, the total annual out-of-pocket maximum for all covered essential benefits shall not exceed the limit in subdivision (b). This section shall not apply to a specialized health insurance policy that does not offer an essential health benefit as defined in Section 10112.27.

(f) The maximum out-of-pocket limit shall apply to any copayment, coinsurance, deductible, and any other form of cost sharing for all covered benefits that meet the definition of essential health benefits, as defined in Section 10112.27.

(g) (1) (A) Except as provided in paragraph (2), if a health insurance policy for family coverage includes a deductible, an individual within a family shall not have a deductible that is greater than the deductible limit for individual coverage for
 that product.

(B) Except as provided in paragraph (2), for a large group market health insurance policy for family coverage that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2017, includes a deductible, an individual within a family shall not have a deductible that is greater than the deductible limit for individual coverage for that product.

(2) (A) If a health insurance policy for family coverage includes a deductible and is a high deductible health plan under the definition set forth in Section 223(c)(2) of Title 26 of the United States Code, the policy shall include a deductible for each individual covered by the policy that is equal to either the amount set forth in Section 223(c)(2)(A)(i)(II) of Title 26 of the United States Code or the deductible for individual coverage under the policy, whichever is greater.

(B) If a large group market health insurance policy for family coverage that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2017, includes a deductible and is a high deductible health plan under the definition set forth in Section 223(c)(2) of Title 26 of the United States Code, the policy shall include a deductible for each individual covered by the policy that is equal to either the amount set forth in Section 223(c)(2)(A)(i)(II) of Title 26 of the United States Code or the deductible for individual coverage under the policy, whichever is greater.

(h) For nongrandfathered health insurance policies in the group market, “policy year” has the meaning set forth in Section 144.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. For nongrandfathered health insurance policies sold in the individual market, “policy year” means the calendar year.

(i) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 641, Sec. 3.   (AB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.281.

(a) A large group health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2022, shall cover medically necessary basic health care services.

(b) “Basic health care services” means all the following:

(1) Physician services, including consultation and referral.

(2) Hospital inpatient services and ambulatory care services.

(3) Diagnostic laboratory and diagnostic and therapeutic radiologic services.

(4) Home health services.

(5) Preventive health services.

(6) Emergency health care services, including ambulance and ambulance transport services and out-of-area coverage. “Basic health care services” includes ambulance and ambulance transport services provided through the “911” emergency response system.

(7) Hospice care that is, at a minimum, equivalent to hospice care provided by the federal Medicare Program pursuant to Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq.) and implementing regulations adopted for hospice care under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act in Part 418 of Chapter IV of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, except Subparts A, B, G, and H, and any amendments or successor provisions.

(c) “Out-of-area coverage” means coverage while an insured is anywhere outside the service area
 of the applicable network, and shall also include coverage for urgently needed services to prevent serious deterioration of an insured’s health resulting from unforeseen illness or injury for which treatment cannot be delayed until the insured returns to the service area.

(d) This section does not prohibit a large group health insurance policy from covering additional benefits.

(e) The commissioner may adopt regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to implement this section. Prior to adopting regulations, the commissioner shall consult with the Department of Managed Health Care to ensure consistency, to the extent practical, with Section 1300.67 of Title 28 of the California Code of Regulations.

(f) (1) If Section 10112.27 is no longer in effect, this section and any regulations implementing this section shall apply to an individual, group, or blanket disability insurance policy that covers hospital, medical, or surgical benefits, except as provided in subdivision (g).

(2) If the condition described in paragraph (1) occurs, the department shall post notice on its internet website that this section applies to an individual, group, or blanket disability insurance policy that covers hospital, medical, or surgical benefits, and shall provide written notice to the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, and the Legislative Counsel.

(g) This section does not apply to a specialized health insurance policy that covers only dental or vision benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 636, Sec. 1.   (SB 280)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.282.
